Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-151
Certified public accountant; person;
use of term C.P.A.; requirements.

No person shall assume or use the title
or designation certified public accountant or the abbreviation C.P.A. or any
other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate that such person is a certified public accountant unless
such person (1) is classified as inactive
under section 1-136 or (2) has been issued a certificate
as a certified public accountant under sections 1-114 to 1-124 and holds a
permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136 which is not revoked
or suspended and all of such person's offices in this state for the practice
of public accountancy are maintained and registered as required under section
1-135.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 46, p. 71;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 41;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 25.